Utah statutes.
17C-1-303.   Summary of sale or other disposition of agency property -- Publication of summary.

(1)  Upon the agency's sale, conveyance, grant, or other disposition of real  property, the agency shall prepare a summary of the material provisions of the disposition.

(2)  Each summary under Subsection (1) shall be a matter of public record.

(3)  The agency shall, no later than one month after the day that the disposition is concluded:

(a)  post each summary under Subsection (1) on the Utah Public Notice Website described in Section 63F-1-701; and

(b) (i)  publish each summary under Subsection (1) at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the agency's boundaries; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation, post the summary in three conspicuous places within the agency's boundaries.



Amended by Chapter 279, 2010 General Session

